en: PDA Accessories
xx: PDA Accessories
cs: PDA – příslušenství
da: PDA – tilbehør
de: PDA-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para PDA
fr: Accessoires pour PDA
it: Accessori PDA
ja: PDA周辺機器
nl: PDA-accessoires
no: PDA-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do urządzeń PDA
pt: Acessórios para PDA
ru: Принадлежности для КПК
sv: PDA-tillbehör
tr: PDA Aksesuarları

en: PDA Cases
xx: PDA Cases
cs: Pouzdra na PDA
da: PDA – covers
de: PDA-Taschen
es: Fundas para PDA
fr: Housses pour PDA
it: Custodie per PDA
ja: PDAケース
nl: PDA-hoezen
no: PDA-etuier
pl: Futerały na urządzenia PDA
pt: Estojos para PDA
ru: Чехлы для КПК
sv: PDA-fodral
tr: PDA Kılıfları

en: Keyboard & Mouse Wrist Rests
xx: Keyboard & Mouse Wrist Rests
cs: Opěrky zápěstí ke klávesnicím a myším
da: Tastatur og mus – håndledsstøtter
de: Tastatur- & Maus-Handballenauflage
es: Reposamuñecas para teclado y ratón
fr: Repose-poignets pour clavier et souris
it: Poggiapolsi per tastiera e mouse
ja: PCキーボード・マウス用リストレスト
nl: Polssteunen voor toetsenbord en muis
no: Håndleddstøtter til tastatur og mus
pl: Podpórki pod nadgarstki do klawiatur i myszek
pt: Descansos de pulso para teclado e mouse
ru: Подушки для запястья
sv: Handledsstöd för tangentbord och möss
tr: Klavye ve Fare Bilek Destekleri

en: Keyboard Trays & Platforms
xx: Keyboard Trays & Platforms
cs: Zásuvky a držáky pro klávesnice
da: Tastaturbakker og -holdere
de: Tastaturablagen
es: Plataformas y bandejas para teclados
fr: Tablettes de clavier, Tablette coulissante pour clavier
it: Supporti per tastiera
ja: PCキーボードトレイ
nl: Toetsenbordladen en -platforms
no: Tastaturbrett og -plattformer
pl: Podstawki pod klawiaturę i myszkę
pt: Bandejas e plataformas para teclado
ru: Платформы и подставки для клавиатуры
sv: Tangentbords- och mushyllor
tr: Klavye Sephaları ve Platformları

en: Laptop Docking Stations
xx: Laptop Docking Stations
cs: Dokovací stanice k notebookům
da: Bærbar computer – dockingstationer
de: Laptop-Dockingstationen
es: Estaciones de conexión para portátiles
fr: Stations d'accueil pour ordinateurs portables
it: Docking station laptop
ja: ノートPC用ドッキングステーション
nl: Dockingstations voor laptops
no: Dokkingstasjoner til bærbare datamaskiner
pl: Stacje dokujące do laptopów
pt: Bases para laptops
ru: Док-станции для ноутбуков
sv: Dockningsstationer för bärbara datorer
tr: Dizüstü Bilgisayar Kenetleme İstasyonları

en: Mouse Pads
xx: Mouse Pads
cs: Podložky pod myš
da: Musemåtter
de: Mousepads
es: Alfombrillas de ratón
fr: Tapis de souris
it: Tappetini per il mouse
ja: マウスパッド
nl: Muismatten
no: Musematter
pl: Podkładki pod myszki
pt: Mouse Pads
ru: Коврики для мыши
sv: Musmattor
tr: Fare Altlıkları

en: Stylus Pen Nibs & Refills
xx: Stylus Pen Nibs & Refills
cs: Náhradní hroty do stylusů
da: Styluspen – spidser og genopfyldning
de: Ersatzspitzen für Stylus Pens
es: Almohadillas y recambios de lápiz óptico
fr: Cartouches pour stylos à plume
it: pennini e ricariche per penne stilografiche
ja: スタイラスペン用ペン先・リフィル
nl: Balpenpunten en -vullingen
no: Spisser og refiller til styluspenner
pl: Wymienne stalówki do rysików
pt: Pontas e recargas para canetas Stylus
ru: Запасные стержни и головки для стилусов
sv: Spetsar och påfyllning för pekpennor
tr: Stylus Kalem Uçları ve Refilleri

en: Stylus Pens
xx: Stylus Pens
cs: Stylusy
da: Styluspenne
de: Stylus Pens
es: Lápices ópticos
fr: Stylets
it: Penne stylus
ja: スタイラスペン
nl: Styluspennen
no: Styluspenner
pl: Rysiki
pt: Canetas Stylus
ru: Стилусы
sv: Pekpennor
tr: Stylus Kalemler

en: Tablet Computer Docks & Stands
xx: Tablet Computer Docks & Stands
cs: Doky a stojánky pro tablety
da: Stativer og standere til tablets
de: Ständer für Tablet-PCs
es: Soportes para tablets
fr: Supports et stands pour tablettes
it: Dock e supporti per tablet
ja: タブレット PC ドック/スタンド
nl: Docks en standaarden voor tabletcomputers
no: Dokkingstasjoner og stativer til nettbrett
pl: Stacje dokujące i stojaki na tablety
pt: Suportes e docas para tablets
ru: Подставки и доки для планшетных ПК
sv: Dockning och stativ för surfplattor
tr: Tablet Bilgisayar Kızakları ve Standları

en: Computer Components
xx: Computer Components
cs: Počítačové komponenty
da: Computerkomponenter
de: Computerkomponenten
es: Componentes para ordenadores
fr: Composants d'ordinateur
it: Componenti per computer
ja: PC部品・周辺機器
nl: Computeronderdelen
no: Datamaskinkomponenter
pl: Elementy komputera
pt: Componentes para computador
ru: Компьютерные компоненты
sv: Datorkomponenter
tr: Bilgisayar Bileşenleri

en: Blade Server Enclosures
xx: Blade Server Enclosures
cs: Skříně pro servery blade
da: Blase server-rack
de: Blade-Server-Gehäuse
es: Chasis para servidores blade
fr: Boîtiers de serveurs lames
it: Chassis per blade server
ja: ブレードサーバー筐体
nl: Bladeserverbehuizingen
no: Bladeserver-kabinetter
pl: Szafy na serwery blade
pt: Caixas para servidores blade
ru: Шкафы для блейд-серверов
sv: Bladserverskåp
tr: Blade Sunucu Kasaları

en: Computer Backplates & I/O Shields
xx: Computer Backplates & I/O Shields
cs: Krycí plechy konektorů počítače
da: Holdere til grafikkort
de: Computer-Backplates & I/O Shields
es: Carcasas y protectores metálicos para torres de ordenador
fr: Plaques arrières et connecteurs d'entrée-sortie
it: Piastre e supporti I/O
ja: PCバックパネル・I/Oシールド
nl: Achterpanelen voor computerkast
no: Bakplate til hovedkort
pl: Śledzie do kart graficznych
pt: Espelhos adaptadores para placa de vídeo
ru: Заглушки для слотов компьютерных плат
sv: Backplates och I/O-skydd
tr: Ekran Kartı Yuva Kapakları

en: Computer Power Supplies
xx: Computer Power Supplies
cs: Zdroje napájení
da: Computer – strømforsyninger
de: Computernetzteile
es: Fuentes de alimentación para ordenadores
fr: Alimentations pour ordinateurs
it: Alimentazione per computer
ja: PC電源ユニット
nl: Computervoeding
no: Strømforsyninger
pl: Zasilacze komputerowe
pt: Fonte de alimentação de computador
ru: Блоки питания для компьютеров
sv: Nätaggregat för datorer
tr: Bilgisayar Güç Kaynakları

en: Computer Processors
xx: Computer Processors
cs: Počítačové procesory
da: Computer – processorer
de: Prozessoren
es: CPU
fr: Processeurs
it: CPU
ja: CPU
nl: CPU's
no: Prosessorer
pl: Procesory komputerowe
pt: CPUs
ru: Процессоры для компьютеров
sv: Datorprocessorer
tr: Bilgisayar İşlemcileri

en: Computer Racks & Mounts
xx: Computer Racks & Mounts
cs: Skříně a držáky na počítače
da: Computer – rack og montering
de: Computerregale & -Befestigungssysteme
es: Carcasas de ordenadores
fr: Boîtiers et baies d'ordinateur
it: Scaffali e supporti computer
ja: PCラック・マウント
nl: Computerracks en -standaarden
no: Datastativer og monteringssystemer
pl: Szafy rackowe
pt: Racks e suportes para computadores
ru: Компьютерные стойки и крепеж
sv: Datorrack
tr: Bilgisayar Rafları ve Montaj Kitleri

en: Computer Starter Kits
xx: Computer Starter Kits
cs: Sady Starter Kit
da: Computer – startsæt
de: Computer-Starter-Kits
es: Paquetes básicos
fr: Kits de démarrage pour ordinateurs
it: Starter kit per computer
ja: PCスターターキット
nl: Starterkits voor computers
no: Startpakker for datamaskin
pl: Komputerowe zestawy startowe
pt: Starter kits para computadores
ru: Комплекты для сборки компьютеров
sv: Startkit för datorer
tr: Bilgisayar Başlangıç Setleri

en: Computer System Cooling Parts
xx: Computer System Cooling Parts
cs: Díly chlazení počítačů
da: Computer – systemkølingsdele
de: Computer-Kühlkomponenten
es: Piezas de refrigeración del sistema para ordenadores
fr: Pièces pour refroidisseurs d'ordinateur
it: Componenti di raffreddamento per PC
ja: PC冷却部品
nl: Koelingonderdelen voor computersystemen
no: Deler til kjøling av datasystemer
pl: Części do systemów chłodzenia komputerów
pt: Peças de sistemas de refrigeração para computadores
ru: Детали для охлаждения компьютерных систем
sv: Kylning för datorsystem
tr: Bilgisayar Sistemi Soğutma Parçaları

en: Desktop Computer & Server Cases
xx: Desktop Computer & Server Cases
cs: Počítačové a serverové skříně
da: Computer – kabinetter
de: PC-Gehäuse
es: Cajas de ordenadores y servidores
fr: Boîtiers pour ordinateurs de bureau et serveurs
it: Case per server e PC
ja: PCタワーケース
nl: Computerbehuizingen
no: Datamaskin- og serverkabinetter
pl: Obudowy komputerowe
pt: Estojos para computador
ru: Корпуса компьютеров
sv: Datorlådor
tr: Masaüstü Bilgisayar ve Sunucu Kasaları

en: E-Book Reader Parts
xx: E-Book Reader Parts
cs: Díly čteček elektronických knih
da: Dele til e-bogslæsere
de: Ersatzteile für E-Book-Reader
es: Piezas para lectores de libros electrónicos
fr: Pièces pour liseuses numériques
it: Componenti per lettori di e-book
ja: 電子書籍リーダーパーツ
nl: Onderdelen voor e-readers
no: Deler til lesebrett
pl: Części do czytników e-booków
pt: Peças para leitores de e-books
ru: Детали для электронных книг
sv: Delar för e-bokläsare
tr: E-Kitap Okuyucu Parçaları

en: E-Book Reader Screens & Screen Digitizers
xx: E-Book Reader Screens & Screen Digitizers
cs: Displeje a dotykové vrstvy pro čtečky elektronických knih
da: Skærme til e-bogslæsere
de: Ersatzbildschirme für E-Book-Reader
es: Pantallas de repuesto para lectores de libros electrónicos
fr: Écrans de rechange pour liseuses numériques
it: Schermi sostitutivi per lettori di e-book
ja: 電子書籍リーダー用スクリーン・デジタイザ
nl: Vervangende schermen voor e-readers
no: Skjermer til lesebrett
pl: Zapasowe ekrany do czytników e-booków
pt: Telas de reposição para leitores de e-books
ru: Сменные экраны для электронных книг
sv: Ersättningsskärmar för e-bokläsare
tr: E-Kitap Okuyucu Yedek Ekranları